New York, session 2025-2026, A9526.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 2 498 to read as follows: 3 § 498. Aversive conditioning. Notwithstanding any provision of law to 4 the contrary: 5 1. No program, agency or facility that is funded, operated, licensed, 6 or approved by the state or an agency or political subdivision of the 7 state shall administer or cause to be administered to a vulnerable 8 person any procedure which uses aversive conditioning. 9 2. No program, agency or facility that is funded, operated, licensed, 10 or approved by the state or an agency or political subdivision of the 11 state shall use any form of physical contact or punishment that is 12 otherwise prohibited by law, or would be prohibited if used on a person 13 who is not vulnerable. 14 3. No program, agency or facility that is funded, operated, licensed, 15 or approved by the state or an agency or political subdivision of the 16 state shall use any procedure or punishment that denies a vulnerable 17 person reasonable sleep, shelter, bedding, bathroom facilities and any 18 other aspect expected of a humane existence. 19 4. Any student with an individualized education program that is effec- 20 tive as of the effective date of this section shall be permitted to 21 complete such program, provided that such student is not subjected to: 22 aversive conditioning; physical contact or punishment that is otherwise 23 prohibited by law, or would be prohibited if used on a person who is not 24 vulnerable; or any other procedure or punishment that denies a vulner- 25 able person reasonable sleep, shelter, bedding, bathroom facilities and 26 any other aspect expected of a humane existence. Provided, however, that EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01508-01-5 A. 9526 2 1 no further individualized education plans shall be funded, operated, 2 licensed, or approved by the state or any agency or political subdivi- 3 sion of the state, if any related program, agency, or facility connected 4 to such individualized education program engages in any conduct that 5 would otherwise be prohibited by this section. 6 5. The provisions of this section shall apply regardless of the 7 location of the relevant conduct or the residence of any impacted 8 persons. 9 § 2. Paragraph (e) of subdivision 1 of section 488 of the social 10 services law, as added by section 1 of part B of chapter 501 of the laws 11 of 2012, is amended to read as follows: 12 (e) "Use of aversive conditioning," which shall mean the application 13 of a physical stimulus that is intended to induce pain or discomfort in 14 order to modify or change the behavior of a person [receiving services 15 in the absence of a person-specific authorization by the operating, 16 licensing or certifying state agency pursuant to governing state agency 17 regulations]. Aversive conditioning may include but is not limited to, 18 the use of physical stimuli such as noxious odors, noxious tastes, 19 blindfolds, the withholding of meals and the provision of substitute 20 foods in an unpalatable form [and], movement limitations used as punish- 21 ment, including but not limited to helmets and mechanical restraint 22 devices and any procedure which causes obvious signs of physical pain, 23 including but not limited to hitting, pinching and electric shock. 24 § 3. Section 488 of the social services law is amended by adding a new 25 subdivision 17 to read as follows: 26 17. "Program" shall mean any residential or non-residential public or 27 private program that provides care, services, programs, and/or support 28 to vulnerable persons. 29 § 4. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 30 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 31 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 32 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 33 on or before such date.